Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.120

Nuisance defined.

Nuisance consists in unlawfully doing an act, or omitting to perform a duty, which act or omission either annoys, injures or endangers the comfort, repose, health or safety of others, offends decency, or unlawfully interferes with, obstructs or tends to obstruct, or render dangerous for passage, any lake or navigable river, bay, stream, canal or basin, or any public park, square, street or highway; or in any way renders other persons insecure in life, or in the use of property.

[Code 1881 s 1235; 1875 p 79 s 1; RRS s 9914.]

NOTES:

Crimes

malicious mischief: Chapter 9.61 RCW.

nuisances: Chapter 9.66 RCW.